Washington statutes.
RCW 43.180.120

Rules for fair allocation of bond proceeds for nonrental single-family housing.

The legislature recognizes that the demand for mortgage loans for nonrental single-family housing will probably greatly exceed the supply of bond proceeds available to satisfy the demand. Therefore, the commission shall adopt rules providing procedures to assure that the bond proceeds available for that kind of housing shall be made available to qualified mortgagors in a fair and equitable manner.

[ 1983 c 161 s 12.]